Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0613

Meetings and notice.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may establish a time, date, and place for regular board meetings, and notice of the time, date, place, or purpose of those meetings is not required.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, notice of the time, date, and place of a special meeting of a board of directors must be given to all directors at least two days before the meeting.

(3) The organic rules may require that the notice under subsection (2) of this section contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, and may additionally require that the meeting be limited to the matters contained in the statement.

[ 2019 c 37 s 613.]